Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.220

Universities and state board for community and technical colleges—Administrative processes.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) Consistent with the state policy to encourage basic and applied scientific research by the state's research universities as stated in RCW 28B.140.005, and consistent with the expectations of university faculty to produce, publish, and disseminate research and scholarship, each university and the state board for community and technical colleges may develop, adopt, and implement one or more written administrative processes that shall apply in place of the obligations imposed on institutions of higher education, faculty, and university research employees under RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, 42.52.150, and 42.52.160. The institutions of higher education shall coordinate on the development of administrative processes to ensure the processes are comparable. Each policy shall apply upon approval by boards of trustees or regents for the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College, or by the state board for community and technical colleges. Each board of trustees or regents and the state board for community and technical colleges must provide the executive ethics board with a copy of each institution's policy upon approval. A faculty member or university research employee in compliance with the processes authorized in this section shall be deemed to be in compliance with RCW 42.52.030, 42.52.040, 42.52.080, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.130, 42.52.140, 42.52.150, and 42.52.160.

(2) The executive ethics board shall enforce activity subject to the written approval processes under this section, as provided in RCW 42.52.360.

[ 2022 c 173 s 3; 2005 c 106 s 4.]